Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5244YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2405 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION ââ STUDY COMMITTEE 1 ââ ADVANCED AIR MOBILITY. 2 1. The department of transportation shall convene a 3 study committee to evaluate whether an advisory committee is 4 necessary to support advanced air mobility planning within this 5 state. All provisions of this Act shall be interpreted in a 6 manner that conforms to and is preempted by applicable federal 7 law, including the Federal Aviation Act and regulations issued 8 by the federal aviation administration. 9 2. The study committee shall include representatives 10 from state aviation experts, vertical takeoff and landing 11 vehicle experts, conventional takeoff and landing vehicle 12 experts, advanced air mobility industries, the department of 13 transportation, and other key stakeholders as determined by the 14 study committee members. 15 3. a. If the study committee determines that an advisory 16 committee is not necessary, the study committee shall still 17 actively solicit input from industry stakeholders and file 18 a report on advanced air mobility planning with the general 19 assembly on or before January 11, 2027. 20 b. If the study committee determines that an advisory 21 committee is necessary, the department shall establish an 22 advisory committee. 23 4. The advisory committee shall do all of the following: 24 a. Review Iowa Code and Iowa administrative code and 25 recommend any changes that are necessary to facilitate advanced 26 air mobility implementation to the general assembly. 27 b. Conduct a fiscal assessment to identify existing 28 resources, estimate future needs, and prioritize investments 29 required for the effective implementation of advanced air 30 mobility. 31 c. Designate a subject matter expert for advanced air 32 mobility within the department of transportation who must be 33 available as a resource for local and regional jurisdictions 34 navigating advances in aviation technology, including electric 35 -1- LSB 5244YH (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2405 powered-lift aircraft and electric aviation. 1 d. Review existing state aviation standards and guidelines, 2 airport facility planning, and compatibility guidance to ensure 3 that the standards, guidelines, planning, and guidance are 4 applicable to advanced air mobility planning. 5 e. Provide local and regional jurisdictions with a 6 guidebook and technical resources to support uniform planning 7 and zoning language across the state related to powered-lift 8 aircraft, electric aviation, and other advances in aviation 9 technology. 10 f. Estimate the required electrical generation and 11 transmission capacity with the major state utilities, for the 12 different implementation phases of advanced air mobility in the 13 state. 14 g. Coordinate with stakeholders to identify possible 15 advanced air mobility transportation hubs throughout the state 16 to support innovative point-to-point transportation options. 17 h. Provide resources and assistance on advanced air 18 mobility technology and infrastructure to local governments, 19 regional councils, transportation planning organizations, the 20 advanced air mobility industry, and other relevant entities 21 to support integration of advanced air mobility innovation 22 with community planning and promote advanced air mobility 23 technology. 24 i. Ensure any recommendations are safe and consistent 25 within this state. 26 j. File a report providing relevant details from the 27 advisory committeeâs actions and recommendations with the 28 general assembly on or before January 10, 2028, including 29 possible permanent codification of this subsection. 30 5. For purposes of this section: 31 a. âAdvanced air mobilityâ means an air transportation 32 system primarily utilizing electric aircraft, including 33 electric vertical takeoff and landing aircraft and electric 34 conventional takeoff and landing aircraft, to carry passengers, 35 -2- LSB 5244YH (2) 91 th/ns 2/ 3 H.F. 2405 carry cargo, or provide services in an urban or regional 1 setting. 2 b. âElectric aircraftâ includes electric vertical takeoff 3 and landing aircraft and electric conventional takeoff and 4 landing aircraft with a gross takeoff weight of three hundred 5 pounds or more. 6 c. âPowered-lift aircraftâ means aircraft capable of 7 vertical takeoff, vertical landing, and low speed flight that 8 depends principally on either engine-driven lift devices or 9 engine thrust for lift and on nonrotating airfoils for lift 10 during horizontal flight. 11 6. This section is repealed July 1, 2028. 12